Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-261
Bonds; negotiable instruments.

The bonds are hereby made negotiable instruments, whether or not in the form of negotiable instruments, subject only to provisions of the bonds relating to registration.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 61;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 60.